Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-20,103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nonprofit Hospital Sale Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(2) Hospital has the meaning found in section 71-419;

(3) Acquisition means any acquisition by a person or persons of an ownership or controlling interest in a hospital, whether by purchase, merger, lease, gift, or otherwise, which results in a change of ownership or control of twenty percent or greater or which results in the acquiring person or persons holding a fifty percent or greater interest in the ownership or control of a hospital, but acquisition does not include the acquisition of an ownership or controlling interest in a hospital owned by a nonprofit corporation if the transferee (a) is a nonprofit corporation having a substantially similar charitable health care purpose as the transferor or is a governmental entity, (b) is exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or as a governmental entity, and (c) will maintain representation from the affected community on the local board; and

(4) Person has the meaning found in section 71-5803.12.

Laws 1996, LB 1188, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 185;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 104;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 528.